Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4125.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "nuclear and hydrogen education grant program act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (b) "Fund" means the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program fund created in the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program fund act. (c) "Postsecondary school" means any degree- or certificate-granting public or private college or university, junior college, community college, or vocational or technical school in this state. (d) "Program" means the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program created in section 4. (e) "Qualified education program" means an instructional program that meets both of the following: (i) Leads to a degree or credential that supports the nuclear industry, the hydrogen industry, or both, including, but not limited to, any skilled craft or engineering program that supports the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of an electricity-generating facility powered by nuclear or hydrogen energy. (ii) Offers or otherwise makes available a scholarship program that provides direct grants or tax credits, or both, to students who commit in good faith to employment at a new or existing electricity-generating facility in this state powered by nuclear or hydrogen energy for a minimum of 3 years following the receipt of a degree or credential. Sec. 3. It is the policy of this state to support the advancement of advanced nuclear and hydrogen industries, including educational programs that support the development of worker skills and human resources useful for the operation of new and existing electricity-generating facilities in this state powered by nuclear or hydrogen energy. Sec. 4. There is created in the department the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program. The program is to be administered by the department for the purpose of awarding grants from the fund on a competitive basis to any postsecondary school that seeks to establish or expand a qualified education program. Sec. 5. The department shall promulgate rules and establish policies and procedures, in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, necessary for the administration of the program, including rules, policies, and procedures for program applications and grant awards. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4124 (request no. H00154'25). (b) House Bill No. 4127 (request no. H00155'25). (c) House Bill No. 4129 (request no. H00156'25). (d) House Bill No. 4126 (request no. H00158'25). (e) House Bill No. 4128 (request no. H01460'25).